tr: Elastik tipi: İpli; Kıvrılmaz; Piko; Diğer
ro-RO: Tipul de elastic: Șnur; Care nu se rulează; Picot; Altele
fi: Kuminauhan tyyppi: Kiristysnauha; Rullautumaton; Nirkko; Muu
de: Art des Gummibands: Kordelzug; Nicht rollend; Picot; Sonstige
zh-TW: 彈性繩類型: 抽繩; 防捲邊; 狗牙邊; 其他
pl: Typ elastyczny: Sznurek ściągający; Niezawijająca się; Z pikotką; Inne
sv: Elasticitet: Dragsko; Rullfri; Picot; Övrigt
sk-SK: Elastický typ: Sťahovacia šnúrka; Odolná voči rolovaniu; Pikotková; Iná
ja: 伸縮性タイプ: ドローストリング; 巻き上がり防止; ピコット; その他
pt-PT: Tipo de elástico: Cordão; Sem enrolamento; Picô; Outro
zh-CN: 弹性类型: 抽绳; 防卷边; 锯齿边; 其他
bg-BG: Тип ластик: С връзка; Непрегъващ се; Пико; Друг
ko: 엘라스틱 유형: 드로스트링; 논롤; 피콧; 기타
pt-BR: Tipo de elástico: Cordão; Não enrola; Picot; Outro
vi: Loại dây thun: Dây rút; Chống cuộn; Picot; Khác
da: Elastiktype: Løbesnor; Ikke-rullende; Picot; Andet
hu: Gumitípus: Húzózsinóros; Nem csavarodó; Pikós; Egyéb
en: Elastic type: Drawstring; Non-roll; Picot; Other
nb: Type elastikk: Snor; Anti-rull; Pikot; Annet
it: Tipo di elastico: Coulisse; Anti-arrotolamento; Picot; Altro
th: ประเภทของยางยืด: เชือกผูก; ไม่ม้วน; ปิโกต์; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Vrsta elastike: Vezica; Ne uvija se; Pikot; Ostalo
cs: Elastický typ: Stahovací šňůrka; Nekroutivá; S pikotkou; Jiné
sl-SI: Vrsta elastike: Zatezna vrvica; Se ne viha; Picot; Drugo
el: Τύπος ελαστικού: Κορδόνι περίσφιξης; Που δεν γυρίζει; Πικώ; Άλλο
nl: Type elastiek: Trekkoord; Niet-oprollend; Picot; Overige
es: Tipo elástico: Cordón; No se enrolla; Picot; Otro
fr: Type élastique: Cordon de serrage; Anti-roulement; Picot; Autre
ru: Тип резинки: Шнурок; Нескручивающаяся; Пико; Другое
lt-LT: Elastinės juostos tipas: Raištelis; Nesiraitanti; Pikot; Kita